apertium-en-es.en.metadix
    <pardef n="liv/e__vblex">
      <e c="CP: regular verbs ending in -e (e,es,ing,ed)">
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r>e<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="spoil__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>t</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="appl/y__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ied</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ied</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="enjoy__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="pa/y__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>y</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ys</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>id</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ying</l>
          <r>y<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ab/ide__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ide</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ide</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ides</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ode</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ided</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ode</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ided</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iding</l>
          <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="approach__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pres"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="past"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ed</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="ger"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="pprs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ing</l>
          <r><s n="vblex"/><sa/><s n="subs"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="tax"><i>tax</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="try"><i>tr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="breach" a="ebenimeli"><i>breach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pay cash"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>cash</l><r><g><b/>cash</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="qualify"><i>qualif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
     <e lm="reside"><i>resid</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="spoil" a="eleka"><i>spoil</i><par n="spoil__vblex"/></e>
	<e lm="pay at the cash desk"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>at<b/>the<b/>cash<b/>desk</l><r><g><b/>at<b/>the<b/>cash<b/>desk</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="spoil fun to" a="eleka"><i>spoil</i><par n="spoil__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>fun<b/>to</l><r><g><b/>fun<b/>to</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="lay drains in" a="eleka"><i>la</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>drains<b/>in</l><r><g><b/>drains<b/>in</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="rush into a decision" a="eleka"><i>rush</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>into<b/>a<b/>decision</l><r><g><b/>into<b/>a<b/>decision</g></r></p></e>
	<e lm="grieve" a="eleka"><i>griev</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="apply"><i>appl</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="betray"><i>betray</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="blame"><i>blam</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="polish"><i>polish</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="classify"><i>classif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="comprise"><i>compris</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="convey"><i>convey</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="delay"><i>delay</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="deploy"><i>deploy</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="derive"><i>deriv</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="destroy"><i>destroy</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="dismay"><i>dismay</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="display"><i>display</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="embarrass"><i>embarrass</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="employ"><i>employ</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="envy"><i>env</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="eradicate"><i>eradicat</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="improvise"><i>improvis</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="intensify"><i>intensif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="lay" a="doriua"><i>la</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="mass"><i>mass</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="obscure"><i>obscur</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="resupply"><i>resuppl</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pay"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pay attention"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/><p><l><b/>attention</l><r><g><b/>attention</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="pray"><i>pray</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="range"><i>rang</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="reach for"><i>reach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>for</l><r><g><b/>for</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="say"><i>sa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="simplify"><i>simplif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="smoke"><i>smok</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="switch"><i>switch</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="worry" a="doriua"><i>worr</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/>    </e>
    <e lm="pay cash"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/>      <p>        <l><b/>cash</l><r><g><b/>cash</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="sway"><i>sway</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/>     </e>
    <e lm="enrich"><i>enrich</i><par n="approach__vblex"/>    </e>
<e lm="relocate"><i>relocat</i><par n="liv/e__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="pacify"><i>pacif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex" /></e>
<e lm="liquefy"><i>liquef</i><par n="appl/y__vblex" /></e>
    <e lm="toil" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>toil</i><par n="spoil__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="allay" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>allay</i><par n="enjoy__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="assay" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>assa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="leach" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>leach</i><par n="approach__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="stultify" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>stultif</i><par n="appl/y__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="repatriate" a="imaxinsoftware"><i>repatriat</i><par n="liv/e__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="pay out"><i>pa</i><par n="pa/y__vblex" sa="sep"/><par n="probj_dem__prn"/><p><l><b/>out</l><r><g><b/>out</g></r></p></e>
